Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0930.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 8. (1) Upon On applying for a certificate, the an electric utility, affiliated transmission company, or independent transmission company shall give public notice in the manner and form the commission prescribes of an opportunity to comment on the application, . Notice shall be including all of the following: (a) A letter sent by mail to all of the following: (i) Each municipality and landowner with property located along the proposed and alternate routes identified in the application for the proposed major transmission line. (ii) Each municipality and landowner with property located within 1 mile of the centerline of the right-of-way for the proposed and alternate routes identified in the application for the proposed major transmission line. (iii) Each municipality and landowner with property located in the geographic area between the proposed and alternate routes identified for the proposed major transmission line. (b) The letter under subdivision (a) must include all of the following: (i) The case number of the docket established for the proposed major transmission line, including instructions on how the person can sign up through the commission's website to receive notifications about the docket. (ii) A highlighted map of the proposed and alternate routes identified in the application. (iii) If the transmission line is more than 5 miles in length, a highlighted map of the geographic area within a 1-mile radius of the proposed and alternate routes, as well as the land between the routes. (iv) The name, address, telephone number, and email address for a dedicated contact person who has knowledge of the development of the proposed major transmission line who is authorized to communicate on behalf of the electric utility, affiliated transmission company, or independent transmission company. (v) Detail regarding the specific type of information the electric utility, affiliated transmission company, or independent transmission company is seeking from the landowners and municipalities, including, but not limited to, the following: (A) Particular characteristics about the landowner's property. (B) Land use. (C) Features of historical or environmental significance. (vi) Rights the electric utility, affiliated transmission company, or independent transmission company is potentially seeking from the landowner. (c) Public notice published in a newspaper of general circulation in the area to be affected within a reasonable time period after an application is provided to the commission. and shall be sent to each affected municipality and each affected landowner on whose property a portion of the proposed major transmission line will be constructed. The notice shall must be written in plain, nontechnical, and easily understood terms and shall contain a title that includes the name of the electric utility, affiliated transmission company, or independent transmission company and the words "NOTICE OF INTENT TO CONSTRUCT A MAJOR TRANSMISSION LINE". (2) The commission shall conduct a proceeding on the application as a contested case under the administrative procedures act of 1969, 1969 PA 306, MCL 24.201 to 24.328. Upon On receiving an application for a certificate, each affected municipality and each affected landowner shall be is granted full intervenor status as of right in commission proceedings concerning the proposed major transmission lines. (3) The commission may assess certificate application fees from the electric utility, affiliated transmission company, or independent transmission company to cover the commission's administrative costs in processing the application and may require the electric utility, affiliated transmission company, or independent transmission company to hire consultants chosen by the commission to assist the commission in evaluating those any issues the application raises. (4) The commission shall grant or deny the application for a certificate not later than 1 year after the application's filing date. If a party submits an alternative route for the proposed major transmission line, the commission shall grant the application for either the electric utility's, affiliated transmission company's, or independent transmission company's proposed route or 1 alternative route or shall deny the application. The commission may condition its approval upon on the applicant electric utility, affiliated transmission company, or independent transmission company taking additional action to assure the public convenience, health, and safety and reliability of the proposed major transmission line. (5) The commission shall grant the application and issue a certificate if it the commission determines all of the following: (a) The quantifiable and nonquantifiable public benefits of the proposed major transmission line justify its construction. (b) The proposed or alternative route is feasible and reasonable. (c) The proposed major transmission line does not present an unreasonable threat to public health or safety. (d) The applicant electric utility, affiliated transmission company, or independent transmission company has accepted the conditions contained in a conditional grant. (6) A certificate issued under this section shall must identify the major transmission line's route and shall contain an estimated cost for the transmission line. (7) If construction of a proposed major transmission line is not begun within 5 years of after the date that a certificate is granted, the certificate is invalid and a new certificate shall be is required for the proposed major transmission line.